Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 18. State Aid to Local Governments.

Secs. 43.18.010 — 43.18.045.
State aid to local governments.
[Repealed, § 11 ch 155 SLA 1980.
For current law, see AS 29.60.]

Sec. 43.18.050.
Specific expenditures. [Repealed, § 3 ch 265 SLA 1976.]

Secs. 43.18.100 — 43.18.135.
[Renumbered as AS 14.11.100 — 14.11.135.]

Sec. 43.18.300.
[Renumbered as AS 29.89.110.]

Secs. 43.18.400 — 43.18.460.
[Renumbered as AS 05.35.010 — 05.35.070.]

Sec. 43.18.500.
[Renumbered as AS 44.33.401 — 44.33.417.]